Louisiana, session 2026, HB843.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:24 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§24. Sexual Assault Survivor Empowerment and Privacy Protection Act; limited
access to personal information for protected individuals
A. The legislature recognizes the importance of empowering those
individuals who are the victims of sexual offenses and the need to protect their
privacy and personal information from disclosure. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to enact statutory provisions to limit public access to personal information
of victims of sexual offenses and to provide for legal consequences for the
unauthorized release of this information. Therefore, this Section shall be known as
"The Sexual Assault Survivor Empowerment and Privacy Protection Act."
B. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Criminal justice agency" means any government agency or subunit, or
private agency that, through statutory authorization or a legal formal agreement with
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-779 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 843
a governmental unit or agency, has the power of investigation, arrest, detention,
prosecution, adjudication, treatment, supervision, and rehabilitation or release of
persons suspected, charged, or convicted of a crime; or that collects, stores,
processes, transmits, or disseminates criminal history records, or crime information.
(2) "Personal information" means all of the following:
(a) Home address.
(b) Home telephone number.
(c) Mobile telephone number.
(d) Personal email address.
(e) Social security number.
(f) Driver's license number.
(g) Federal tax identification number.
(h) Bank account number, including checking and savings accounts.
(i) Credit or debit card number.
(j) License plate number or unique identifier of a vehicle.
(k) Marital record.
(l) Date of birth.
(m) School or daycare of a child.
(n) Place of worship.
(o) Employment location of a spouse, child, or dependent.
(3) "Protected individual" means a victim of a sexual offense as defined in
R.S. 15:541.
(4) "Publish" means to publicly post or publicly display on the internet
personal information of a protected individual who submits a request pursuant to
Subsection C of this Section.
C.(1) A protected individual may request that a public body or third party:
(a) Not publish the protected individual's personal information.
(b) Remove the protected individual's personal information from any existing
publication.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-779 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 843
(2) A request made in accordance with this Subsection shall:
(a) Be in writing and contain the document type, description of the location
on the public body's website, date of filing, registry or docket number, and an email
address for correspondence.
(b) Be sent by certified mail or by email.
(c) Provide sufficient information to confirm that the requester is a protected
individual.
(d) Identify the document, posting, or other publication containing the
personal information.
(3) A request made pursuant to this Subsection may include the personal
information of a person who resides in the same household of the protected
individual who is the spouse, child, or dependent of the protected individual.
(4) The protected individual shall be responsible for confirming receipt of the
request.
D.(1) Not later than five days after receiving a request as provided by
Subsection C of this Section, a public body shall acknowledge receipt of the request
in writing by certified mail or by email and take steps reasonably necessary to ensure
that the personal information is not published.
(2) If the personal information is already published, the public body shall
remove the personal information within seventy-two hours after acknowledgment of
receipt of the request or provide a reason in writing why the request has not been
fulfilled.
E. On receipt of a request pursuant to Subsection C of this Section, a third
party to whom a request is made shall do both of the following:
(1) Provide for the removal of the personal information within seventy-two
hours after receipt of the request.
(2) Notify the protected individual or the judicial administrator's office by
certified mail or by email of the removal.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-779 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 843
F. A protected individual may bring an action for mandamus due to a
violation of this Section against a public body or third party for all of the following:
(1) Declaratory relief.
(2) Injunctive relief.
(3) Reasonable attorney fees.
(4) For a third party, an action for a violation of this Section may also be
brought for damages incurred as a result of a violation of this Section.
G. A person shall not knowingly publish the personal information of a
protected individual if he knows or reasonably should know that publishing the
personal information poses an imminent and serious threat to the protected individual
and the publishing of the personal information results in any of the following:
(1) An assault in any degree.
(2) Harassment.
(3) Trespass.
(4) Malicious destruction of property.
H. A person who violates this Section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding eighteen months or a fine not
exceeding five thousand dollars, or both. Neither this provision nor any other
penalty provision shall apply to a public body.
I. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, an individual who is
recognized as a protected individual shall not be exempt from publication or removal
of his personal information from records publicly posted by the office of the
secretary of state.